Utah statutes.
78A-5-110.   Allocation of district court fees and forfeitures.

(1)  Except as provided in this section, district court fines and forfeitures collected for violation of state statutes shall be paid to the state treasurer.

(2)  Fines and forfeitures collected by the court for violation of a state statute or county or municipal ordinance constituting a misdemeanor or an infraction shall be remitted 1/2 to the state treasurer and 1/2 to the treasurer of the state or local governmental entity which prosecutes or which would prosecute the violation.

(3)  Fines and forfeitures collected for violations of Title 23, Wildlife Resources Code of Utah, Title 41, Chapter 22, Off-highway Vehicles, or Title 73, Chapter 18, State Boating Act, shall be paid to the state treasurer.

(a)  For violations of Title 23, the state treasurer shall allocate 85% to the Division of Wildlife Resources and 15% to the General Fund.

(b)  For violations of Title 41, Chapter 22, or Title 73, Chapter 18, the state treasurer shall allocate 85% to the Division of Parks and Recreation and 15% to the General Fund.

(4)  Fines and forfeitures collected for violation of Section 72-7-404 or 72-7-406, less fees established by the Judicial Council, shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit in the B and C road account.  Fees established by the Judicial Council shall be deposited in the state General Fund.  Money deposited in the class B and C road account is supplemental to the money appropriated under Section 72-2-107 but shall be expended in the same manner as other class B and C road funds.

(5) (a)  Fines and forfeitures collected by the court for a second or subsequent violation under Section 41-6a-1713 or Subsection 72-7-409(8)(b) shall be remitted:

(i)  60% to the state treasurer to be deposited in the Transportation Fund; and

(ii)  40% in accordance with Subsection (2).

(b)  Fines and forfeitures collected by the court for a second or subsequent violation under Subsection 72-7-409(8)(c) shall be remitted:

(i)  50% to the state treasurer to be deposited in the Transportation Fund; and

(ii)  50% in accordance with Subsection (2).

(6)  Fines and forfeitures collected for any violations not specified in this chapter or otherwise provided for by law shall be paid to the state treasurer.

(7)  Fees collected in connection with civil actions filed in the district court shall be paid to the state treasurer.

(8)  The court shall remit money collected in accordance with Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

